apertium-spa-qve.qve.lexc
LEXICON ADV-Temp
%<adv%>%<temp%>: N-FLEX-Caso ;   ! por ahora así nomás (podrá salir con locativo)

LEXICON CONJ-Adv
%<cnjadv%>: # ;

LEXICON CONJ-Adv-Final
%<cnjadv%>: CLIT-Final ;

LEXICON CONJ-Coord
%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON CONJ-Coord-Final
%<cnjcoo%>: CLIT-Final ;

LEXICON Interj
%<ij%>: # ;

!LEXICON V-COP
%<vbcop%>: V-DER ;

LEXICON V-EX
%<vbex%>: V-DER ;

! LEXICON V-MOD
! %<vbmod%>: V-DER ;

!LEXICON V-IV
!%<vblex%>: V-DER ;
!%<vblex%>%<iv%>: V-DER ;

!LEXICON V-TV
!%<vblex%>: V-DER ;
!%<vblex%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;

!LEXICON V-VM
!%<vblex%>: V-DER ;
!%<vblex%>%<vm%>: V-DER ;

!LEXICON V-COM
!%<vblex%>: V-DER ;
!%<vblex%>%<vcm%>: V-DER ;

!LEXICON V-IMPERS
!%<vblex%>: V-DER ;
!%<vblex%>%<vimp%>: V-DER ;

LEXICON V-VERBOS
%<vblex%>: V-DER ;


LEXICON PronombresPersonales	
	pay%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:pay N-FLEX-Incl ;  ! él
	pay%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dim%>:paycha N-FLEX-Incl ;  ! él
	pay%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:paykuna N-FLEX-Incl ;  ! ellos
	pay%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:paychakuna N-FLEX-Incl ;  ! ellos
	qan%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:qan N-FLEX-Incl ;  ! tú, usted
	qan%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dim%>:qancha N-FLEX-Incl ;  ! tú, usted
	personayki%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:personayki N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! usted
	personayki%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dim%>:personallayki N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! usted
	personayki%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dim%>%<lim%>:personachallayki N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! usted
	personayki%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<lim%>:personachayki N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! usted
	personaykichis%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:personaykichis N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! ustedes
	personaykichis%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:personachaykichis N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! ustedes
	personaykichis%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dim%>%<lim%>:personachallaykichis N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! ustedes
	personaykichis%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<lim%>:personallaykichis N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! ustedes
	qan%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:qankuna N-FLEX-Incl ;  ! vosotros, ustedes
	qan%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:qanchakuna N-FLEX-Incl ;  ! vosotros, ustedes
	nuqa:nuqa PronombresPersonales-Nuqa ;  ! yo/nosotros
	ñuqa:ñuqa PronombresPersonales-Nuqa ;  ! yo/nosotros
LEXICON PronombresPersonales-Nuqa	
	%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>: N-FLEX-Incl ;  ! nuqa yo
	nchis%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1in%>%<pl%>:nchis N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! nuqanchis "nosotros" (inclusivo)   
	y%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:y N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! nuqay "yo" (idiomático)   
	yku%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1ex%>%<pl%>:yku N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! nuqayku "nosotros" (exclusivo)   
	%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dim%>:cha N-FLEX-Incl ;  ! 
	%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dim%>%<lim%>:challa N-FLEX-Incl ;  ! 
	%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<lim%>:lla N-FLEX-Incl ;  ! 
	nchis%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1in%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:chanchis N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! 
	nchis%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1in%>%<pl%>%<dim%>%<lim%>:challanchis N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! 
	nchis%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1in%>%<pl%>%<lim%>:llanchis N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! 
	y%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dim%>:chay N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! 
	y%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dim%>%<lim%>:challay N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! 
	y%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<lim%>:llay N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! 
	yku%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1ex%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:chayku N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! 
	yku%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1ex%>%<pl%>%<dim%>%<lim%>:challayku N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! 
	yku%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1ex%>%<pl%>%<lim%>:llayku N-FLEX-Inter ;  ! 


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!      L E X I C O N E S   D E   R A Í C E S  /  T E M A S        !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NombresGeneroF	 !	<section id = "NombresGeneroF" type = "standard">
	apucha:apucha N-F ;  ! abuelo	
	hatucha:hatucha N-F ;  ! abuelo	
	paya:paya N-F ;  ! abuelo	
	p%'asña:p%'asña N-F ;  ! adolescente	
	awkilla:awkilla N-F ;  ! bisabuela	
	anpullu:anpullu N-F ;  ! bisnieta	
	sipas:sipas N-F ;  ! chica	
	imilla:imilla N-F ;  ! chico	
	awalla:awalla N-F ;  ! gemelo	
	wispalla:wispalla N-F ;  ! gemelo	
	china:china N-F ;  ! hembra	
	ñaña:ñaña N-F ;  ! hermano	
	pana:pana N-F ;  ! hermano	
	pani:pani N-F ;  ! hermano	
	ususi:ususi N-F ;  ! hijo	
	ususi:ususi N-F ;  ! hijo	
	warmi% wawa:warmi% wawa N-F ;  ! hijo	
	mama:mama N-F ;  ! madre	
	p%'asña:p%'asña N-F ;  ! mozo	
	warmi:warmi N-F ;  ! mujer	
	warmi:warmi N-F ;  ! mujer	
	warmi% irqi:warmi% irqi N-F ;  ! niño	
	qhachun:qhachun N-F ;  ! nuera	
	ayllu% ñaña:ayllu% ñaña N-F ;  ! prima	
	qaylla% ñaña:qaylla% ñaña N-F ;  ! primo	
	qaylla% pana:qaylla% pana N-F ;  ! primo	
	sispa% ñaña:sispa% ñaña N-F ;  ! primo	
	sispa% pana:sispa% pana N-F ;  ! primo	
	quya:quya N-F ;  ! reina	
	sapay% quya:sapay% quya N-F ;  ! reina	
	kuya:kuya N-F ;  ! rey	
	mama:mama N-F ;  ! señor	
	mamita:mamita N-F ;  ! señor	
	palla:palla N-F ;  ! señor	
	sipas:sipas N-F ;  ! señorita	
	aqi:aqi N-F ;  ! suegra	
	ñawpa% paya:ñawpa% paya N-F ;  ! suegra	
	aqu:aqu N-F ;  ! suegro	
	kisma:kisma N-F ;  ! suegro	
	kiwachi:kiwachi N-F ;  ! suegro	
	tiya:tiya N-F ;  ! tía	
	ipa:ipa N-F ;  ! tío	
	paya:paya N-F ;  ! viejo	
	mamacha:mamacha N-F ;  ! Virgen	
	qachun:qachun N-F ;  ! yerna	
LEXICON NombresHisp	 !	<section id = "NombresHisp" type = "standard">
	alcalde:alcalde N ;  ! alcalde	
	birrete:birrete N ;  ! birrete	
	carnaval:carnaval N ;  ! carnaval	
	coro:coro N ;  ! coro	
	democracia:democracia N ;  ! democracia	
	derecho:derecho N ;  ! derecho	
	dios:dios N ;  ! Dios	
	don:don N ;  ! don	
	doña:doña N ;  ! doña	
	empresa:empresa N ;  ! empresa	
	español:español N ;  ! español	
	estado:estado N ;  ! estado	
	estanco:estanco N ;  ! estanco	
	indígena:indígena N ;  ! indígena	
	nación:nación N ;  ! nación	
	nacionalidad:nacionalidad N ;  ! nacionalidad	
	política:política N ;  ! política	
	español:ispañul N ;  ! 	
	estanco:istanku N ;  ! 	
	indígena:indihina N ;  ! 	
	nación:nacion N ;  ! 	
	nación:nashun N ;  ! 	
	política:politica N ;  ! 	
	política:politika N ;  ! 	
LEXICON NombresDerivados	 !	<section id = "NombresDerivados" type = "standard">
	qilqaq:qilqaq N ;  ! escritor	
	tukukuy:tukukuy N ;  ! fin	
	rimaq:rimaq N ;  ! hablante	
	yarqay:yarqay N ;  ! hambre	
	pukllay:pukllay N ;  ! juego	
	rimay:rimay N ;  ! lengua	
	yuyay:yuyay N ;  ! opinión	
	tapusqa:tapusqa N ;  ! pregunta	
	tiyana:tiyana N ;  ! silla	
	uyarikuy:uyarikuy N ;  ! sonido	
	qhawana:qhawana N ;  ! ventana	
	kawsay:kawsay N ;  ! vida	
LEXICON NombresPropOtros	 !	<section id = "NombresPropOtros" type = "standard">
	Academia% Mayor% De% La% Lengua% Quechua:Academia% Mayor% De% La% Lengua% Quechua NP-AL ;  ! Academia<b/>Mayor<b/>de<b/>la<b/>Lengua<b/>Quechua	
	Qhiswa% Simi% Hamut%'Ana% Kuraq% Suntur:Qhiswa% Simi% Hamut%'Ana% Kurak% Suntur NP-AL ;  ! Academia<b/>Mayor<b/>de<b/>la<b/>Lengua<b/>Quechua	
	Qhiswa% Simi% Hamut%'Ana% Kuraq% Suntur:Qhiswa% Simi% Hamut%'Ana% Kuraq% Suntur NP-AL ;  ! Academia<b/>Mayor<b/>de<b/>la<b/>Lengua<b/>Quechua	
	Amlq:Amlq%- NP-AL ;  ! AMLQ	
	Amlq:Amlq NP-AL ;  ! AMLQ	
	Qshks:Qshks NP-AL ;  ! AMLQ	
	Qshks:Qshks%- NP-AL ;  ! AMLQ	
	Hukllasqa% Llaqtakuna:Hukllasqa% Llaqtakuna NP-AL ;  ! Naciones<b/>Unidas	
	Hukllasqa% Nacionkuna:Hukllasqa% Nacionkuna NP-AL ;  ! Naciones<b/>Unidas	
	Huñunakusqa% Llaqtakuna%<Np%>%<Al%>%<Pl%>:Huñunakusqa% Llaqtakuna N-FLEX-Incl ;  ! Naciones<b/>Unidas	
	Huñunakusqa% Nacionkuna%<Np%>%<Al%>%<Pl%>:Huñunakusqa% Nacionkuna N-FLEX-Incl ;  ! Naciones<b/>Unidas	
	Sil:Sil%- NP-AL ;  ! SIL	
	Sil:Sil NP-AL ;  ! SIL	
	Sil% International:Sil% International NP-AL ;  ! SIL<b/>International	
LEXICON AdjetivosHisp	 !	<section id = "AdjetivosHisp" type = "standard">
	castellano:castellano ADJ ;  ! castellano	
	kastillanu:kastillanu ADJ ;  ! castellano	
	español:español ADJ ;  ! español	
	español:ispañul ADJ ;  ! español	
	indígena:indígena ADJ ;  ! indígena	
	indígena:indihina ADJ ;  ! indígena	
	libre:libre ADJ ;  ! libre	
	nacional:nacional ADJ ;  ! nacional	
	nacional:nashunal ADJ ;  ! nacional	
	tambobambina:tambobambina ADJ-F ;  ! tambobambina	
	tambobambino:tambobambino ADJ-M ;  ! tambobambino	

LEXICON Verbos	 !	<section id = "Verbos" type = "standard">
	mak%'alliy:mak%'alli V-VERBOS ;  ! abrazar	
	wawachay:wawacha V-VERBOS ;  ! acariciar	
	riysiy:riysi V-VERBOS ;  ! acompañar	
	huchachay:huchacha V-VERBOS ;  ! acusar	
	much%'aykuy:much%'ayku V-VERBOS ;  ! adorar	
	sayk'uy:sayk'u V-VERBOS ;  ! agitarse	
	utkhuy:utkhu V-VERBOS ;  ! agujerear	
	taripay:taripa V-VERBOS ;  ! alcanzar	
	mañay:maña V-VERBOS ;  ! alquilar	
	anyay:anya V-VERBOS ;  ! amonestar	
	kallpanchay:kallpancha V-VERBOS ;  ! animar	
	llakiy:llaki V-VERBOS ;  ! apenarse	
	khuyay:khuya V-VERBOS ;  ! apreciar	
	hasp%'iy:hasp%'i V-VERBOS ;  ! arañar	
	t%'ipiy:t%'ipi V-VERBOS ;  ! arrancar	
	k%'imiy:k%'imi V-VERBOS ;  ! arrimar	
	mukiy:muki V-VERBOS ;  ! asfixiar	
	chiqaqchay:chiqaqcha V-VERBOS ;  ! atestiguar	
	ch%'usay:ch%'usa V-VERBOS ;  ! ausentarse	
	llawsay:llawsa V-VERBOS ;  ! babear	
	añaychay:añaycha V-VERBOS ;  ! bendecir	
	haywariy:haywari V-VERBOS ;  ! brindar	
	kallchay:kallcha V-VERBOS ;  ! calchar	
	pisipay:pisipa V-VERBOS ;  ! cansarse	
	saway:sawa V-VERBOS ;  ! casarse	
	chiqaqchay:chiqaqcha V-VERBOS ;  ! certificar	
	hayt%'ay:hayt%'a V-VERBOS ;  ! chutear	
	hank%'ay:hank%'a V-VERBOS ;  ! cojear	
	mikhuy:mikhu V-VERBOS ;  ! comer	
	pallway:pallwa V-VERBOS ;  ! concluir	
	riqsiy:riqsi V-VERBOS ;  ! conocer	
	t%'inkuy:t%'inku V-VERBOS ;  ! contactar	
	urway:urwa V-VERBOS ;  ! copular	
	tumiy:tumi V-VERBOS ;  ! cortar	
	wiñay:wiña V-VERBOS ;  ! crecer	
	yupay:yupa V-VERBOS ;  ! cuantificar	
	hanpiy:hanpi V-VERBOS ;  ! curar	
	khuyapayay:khuyapaya V-VERBOS ;  ! dar<g><b/>lástima</g>	
	apuray:apura V-VERBOS ;  ! darse<g><b/>prisa</g>	
	ñak%'ay:ñak%'a V-VERBOS ;  ! degollar	
	qarquy:qarqu V-VERBOS ;  ! deportar	
	wasapay:waspa V-VERBOS ;  ! desaparecer	
	tariy:tari V-VERBOS ;  ! descubrir	
	alquchay:alqucha V-VERBOS ;  ! deshonrar	
	ch%'ustiy:ch%'usti V-VERBOS ;  ! desnudar	
	rikch%'ay:rikch%a V-VERBOS ;  ! despertar	
	t%'iqway:t%'iqwa V-VERBOS ;  ! desvainar	
	ayni% kutichiy:ayni% kutichi V-VERBOS ;  ! devolver<b/>la<b/>ayuda<b/>recibida 	
	kuskanchay:kuskancha V-VERBOS ;  ! dividir<g><b/>en<b/>dos</g>	
	iskayyay:iskayya V-VERBOS ;  ! dudar	
	ruway:ruwa V-VERBOS ;  ! elaborar	
	t%'urpuy:t%'urpu V-VERBOS ;  ! empalar	
	wisq%'ay:wisq%'a V-VERBOS ;  ! encerrar	
	engañay:engaña V-VERBOS ;  ! engañar	
	waskhay:waskha V-VERBOS ;  ! enlazar	
	aypay:aypa V-VERBOS ;  ! entender	
	tapuy:tapu V-VERBOS ;  ! entrevistar	
	pantay:panta V-VERBOS ;  ! equivocarse	
	muchuy:muchu V-VERBOS ;  ! escasear	
	t%'akay:t%'aka V-VERBOS ;  ! esparcir	
	kallay:kalla V-VERBOS ;  ! estar<b/>solo	
	khatatatay:khatatata V-VERBOS ;  ! estremecerse	
	kawsay:kawsa V-VERBOS ;  ! existir	
	hurquy:hurqu V-VERBOS ;  ! extraer	
	t%'ikay:t%'ika V-VERBOS ;  ! florecer	
	suyuy:suyu V-VERBOS ;  ! ganar	
	ruray:rura V-VERBOS ;  ! hacer	
	saksay:saksa V-VERBOS ;  ! hartarse	
	kay:ka V-EX ;  ! hay	
	yachapayay:yachapaya V-VERBOS ;  ! imitar	
	atiykuy:atiyku V-VERBOS ;  ! intentar	
	pukllay:puklla V-VERBOS ;  ! jugar	
	ñawiriy:ñawiri V-VERBOS ;  ! leer	
	ranpay:ranpa V-VERBOS ;  ! llevar	
	apachiy:apachi V-VERBOS ;  ! mandar	
	mawlliy:mawlli V-VERBOS ;  ! menear	
	kutay:kuta V-VERBOS ;  ! moler	
	rit%'iy:rit%'i V-VERBOS ;  ! nevar	
	musmuy:musmu V-VERBOS ;  ! olfatear	
	lluqsiy:llosi V-VERBOS ;  ! partir	
	t%'iqway:t%'iqwa V-VERBOS ;  ! pelar	
	upsay:upsa V-VERBOS ;  ! picotear	
	apay:apa V-VERBOS ;  ! portar	
	rikuchiy:rikuchi V-VERBOS ;  ! probar	
	kanay:kana V-VERBOS ;  ! quemar	
	ruway:ruwa V-VERBOS ;  ! realizar	
	asikuy:asiku V-VERBOS ;  ! reir	
	respetay:respeta V-VERBOS ;  ! respetar	
	qhatqiy:qhatqi V-VERBOS ;  ! saber<g><b/>como<b/>la<b/>hiel</g>	
	kruschakuy:kruschaku V-VERBOS ;  ! santiguarse	
	pachaña% kay:pachaña% ka V-EX ;  ! ser<g><b/>hora<b/>de</g>	
	qaray:qara V-VERBOS ;  ! servir	
	watunayay:watunaya V-VERBOS ;  ! sospechar	
	away:awa V-VERBOS ;  ! tejer	
	kapuy:kapu V-EX ;  ! tener	
	tukuy:tuku V-VERBOS ;  ! terminar	
	q%'irwiy:q%'irwi V-VERBOS ;  ! torcer	
	lluqhay:lluqha V-VERBOS ;  ! trepar	
	watupakuy:watupaku V-VERBOS ;  ! vaticinar	
	phalay:phala V-VERBOS ;  ! volar	
